Massachusetts, session 194th, H163.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 94I of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of “Card holder” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
“Card holder,” a registered qualifying patient, personal caregiver, or agent of a medical
marijuana treatment center who has been issued and possesses a valid registration card, or an
individual who possesses a valid patient registration for medical use marijuana issued by a
jurisdiction of the United States.
SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of Section 2 of Chapter 94I is hereby amended by striking
the words: "may sell medical use marijuana to a card holder” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:-
“licensed and authorized by the Commission to dispense or deliver medical use marijuana
may sell medical use marijuana to a card holder”
of 3

SECTION 3. Paragraph 2 of Subsection (b) of Section 2 of Chapter 94I is hereby
amended by striking the words: "qualifying patient or a personal caregiver" and inserting in place
thereof the following words:-
"card holder”
SECTION 4. Subsection (c) of Section 2 of Chapter 94I is hereby amended by striking
the words: "qualifying patients or their personal caregivers” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:-
"card holders”
SECTION 5. Subsection (ii) of Section 6 of Chapter 94I is hereby amended by striking
the word:-
“or”
SECTION 6. Subsection (iii) of Section 6 of Chapter 94I is hereby amended by striking
the period at the end of the clause and inserting in place thereof a semicolon.
SECTION 7. Section 6 of Chapter 94I is hereby amended by adding the following
subsection:-
"(iv) require medical use marijuana licensees to simultaneously cultivate, process, and
dispense medical use marijuana as a condition of obtaining or maintaining licensure to operate a
medical marijuana treatment center; or”
SECTION 8. Section 6 of Chapter 94I is hereby further amended by adding the following
subsection:-
of 3

"(v) require that an applicant for a medical use marijuana license demonstrate initial
capital resources of $500,000 for an initial license application or $400,000 for subsequent
applications for licensure.”
SECTION 9. Section 7 of Chapter 94I is hereby amended by striking the words: “for
medical marijuana treatment centers so as to defray the administrative costs of the medical
marijuana program and ensure the medical marijuana program is revenue neutral” and inserting
in place thereof the following words:-
"and license fees for medical marijuana treatment centers that shall not exceed $1,000
each. A social equity business, as defined in Chapter 94G, shall be exempt from these fees.”
SECTION 10. Subsection (b) of Section 14 of Chapter 94G is hereby amended by
inserting after the words "enforcement of this chapter" the following words:-
“, and chapter 94I,”
of 3